Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 12. PLANNING AND DEVELOPMENT

SUBTITLE B. COUNTY PLANNING AND DEVELOPMENT

CHAPTER 388. GRANT PROGRAM FOR UNINCORPORATED COMMUNITIES IN CERTAIN COUNTIES

Sec. 388.001. APPLICABILITY. This chapter applies only to a county that:

(1) has a population of not more than 3,000;

(2) is adjacent to at least three counties with populations of less than 10,000; and

(3) is located on an international border.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 492 (H.B. 1330), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2023.

Sec. 388.002. IMPROVEMENT PROJECT GRANT PROGRAM. (a) The commissioners court of a county by order may establish and implement a grant program for the purpose of funding public improvement projects to benefit unincorporated communities located in the county.

(b) A public improvement project includes:

(1) the acquisition, construction, or improvement of:

(A) sidewalks, streets, roads, or other transportation infrastructure;

(B) water, wastewater, or drainage facilities or improvements; or

(C) other public facilities or improvements; and

(2) special supplemental services for improvement and promotion of the area, including services relating to advertising, promotion, health and sanitation, water and wastewater, public safety, security, business recruitment, development, recreation, and cultural enhancement.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 492 (H.B. 1330), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2023.

Sec. 388.003. GIFTS, GRANTS, AND DONATIONS. The county may apply for and accept a gift, grant, or donation from any source to fund a public improvement project described by Section 388.002.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 492 (H.B. 1330), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2023.